Utah statutes.
13-22-4.   Violation a misdemeanor -- Damages.

(1)  A person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter, either by failing to comply with any requirement or by doing any act prohibited in the chapter, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  Each day the violation is committed or permitted to continue constitutes a separate punishable offense.

(2)  Nothing in this section precludes any person damaged as a result of a charitable solicitation from maintaining a civil action for damages or injunctive relief.

(3)  The division may maintain an action for damages or injunctive relief on behalf of itself or any other person to enforce compliance with this chapter.

